North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-4A.

Recodified as

G.S. 135-4.1

by Session Laws 2006-264, s. 14, effective August 27, 2006.

§ 135-4.1.
Reciprocity of creditable service with other State-administered retirement systems.

Members First Hired Prior to January 1, 2021. — Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Article for members first hired prior to January 1, 2021, creditable service standing to the credit of a member of the Legislative
Retirement System, Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System or service standing to the credit of a member of the Optional Retirement Program shall be added to the creditable
service standing to the credit of a member of this System; provided, that in the event a person is a retired member of any of the foregoing retirement systems or the Optional Retirement Program, such creditable service standing
or service standing to the credit of the retired member prior to retirement shall be likewise counted. In no instance shall service credits maintained in the aforementioned retirement systems or the Optional Retirement Program
be added to the creditable service in this System for application of this System’s benefit accrual rate in computing a service retirement benefit unless specifically authorized by this Article.

(a1)

Members First Hired on or After January 1, 2021. —
Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Article for members first hired on or after January 1, 2021, creditable service standing to the credit of a member of the Legislative
Retirement System, Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall be added to the creditable service standing to the credit of a member of this System, provided that in
the event a person is a retired member of any of the foregoing retirement systems such creditable service standing or service standing to the credit of the retired member prior to retirement shall be likewise counted. In no
instance shall service credits maintained in the aforementioned retirement systems be added to the creditable service in this System for application of this System’s benefit accrual rate in computing a service retirement benefit
unless specifically authorized by this Article.

A person who was a former member of this System and who has forfeited his creditable service in this System by receiving a return of contributions and who has creditable service in the Legislative Retirement System, Consolidated Judicial Retirement System,
or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System may count such creditable service for the purpose of restoring the creditable service forfeited in this System under the terms and conditions as set forth in this Article and
reestablish membership in this System.

Creditable service under this section shall not be counted twice for the same period of time whether earned as a member, purchased, or granted as prior service credits.

History.
1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 35(c); 2006-264, s. 14; 2010-38, s. 1; 2018-52, s. 7.